Arkansas, session 2025, SB539.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-4-304(c)(1), concerning confinement as a
condition of a suspended sentence or probation, is amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1)(A) The period actually spent in confinement pursuant to this
section in a county jail, city jail, or other authorized local detention,
correctional, or rehabilitative facility shall not exceed:
(i) One hundred twenty (120) days in the case of a
felony; or
(ii) Thirty (30) days in the case of a misdemeanor.
*CEB171*
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(B) In the case of confinement to a facility in the
Division of Community Correction community correction center operated or
contracted by a division of the Department of Corrections, the period
actually spent in confinement under this section shall not exceed three
hundred sixty-five (365) days.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-4-312(b), concerning placement in a
community correction program, is amended to read as follows:
(b) Upon a preliminary determination by a court that a defendant is an
eligible offender and that placement in a community correction program under
§ 16-93-1201 et seq. is proper, the court may:
(1)(A) Suspend the imposition of the sentence or place the
defendant on probation, under § 5-4-104, § 5-4-201 et seq., §§ 5-4-301 — 5-4-
307, and § 16-93-314.
(B) A sentence under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section
may be accompanied by assignment to a community correction program under §
16-93-1201 et seq. for a designated period of time commensurate with the
goals of the community correction program assignment and the rules
established by the Board of Corrections for the operation of community
correction programs.
(C) The court shall maintain jurisdiction over the
defendant sentenced under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section with
supervision outside the confines of the specific programming provided by
probation officers assigned to the court.
(D)(i) If a person sentenced under subdivision (b)(1)(A)
of this section violates any term or condition of his or her sentence or term
of probation, revocation of the sentence or term of probation shall be
consistent with the procedures established by law for the revocation of
suspended imposition of sentence or probation.
(ii) Upon revocation as described in subdivision
(b)(1)(D)(i) of this section, the court shall determine whether the defendant
shall remain under the jurisdiction of the court and be assigned to a more
restrictive community correction program, facility, or institution for a
period of time or committed to the Division of Correction. a secured facility
operated or contracted by a division of the Department of Corrections;
(iii) If the defendant is committed to the Division
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
of Correction under subdivision (b)(1)(D)(ii) of this section, the court
shall specify if the commitment is for judicial transfer of the defendant to
the Division of Community Correction or is a commitment to the Division of
Correction;
(2)(A) Commit the defendant to the custody of the Division of
Correction for judicial transfer to the Division of Community Correction a
community correction center operated or contracted by a division of the
department subject to the following:
(i) That the sentence imposed provides that the
defendant shall not serve more than three (3) years of confinement, with
credit for meritorious good time or earned release credits, with initial
placement in a Division of Community Correction facility community correction
center operated or contracted by a division of the department; and
(ii) That the preliminary placement in the Division
of Community Correction facility a community correction center operated or
contracted by a division of the department is conditioned upon the Division
of Community Correction's department's final determination of the defendant's
initial and continuing eligibility for Division of Community Correction
community correction center placement and the defendant's compliance with all
applicable rules established by the Board of Corrections for community
correction programs.
(B) Post-prison supervision of the defendant shall
accompany and follow the community correction program when appropriate; or
(3)(A) Sentence the defendant to the Division of Correction,
granting the Division of Correction the ability to administratively transfer
the defendant to the Division of Community Correction a community correction
center operated or contracted by a division of the department if the Division
of Correction determines that the sentence imposed meets the eligibility
requirements for placement in a community correction program under this
subchapter and § 16-93-1201 et seq.
(B) Administrative transfer to the Division of Community
Correction a community correction center operated or contracted by a division
of the department under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this section is conditioned
upon bed space availability and upon the Division of Community Correction's
department's final determination of the defendant's initial and continuing
eligibility for Division of Community Correction community correction center
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
placement.
(C) A determination of ineligibility under subdivision
(b)(3)(B) of this section by the Division of Community Correction department
shall result in the immediate return removal of the defendant to the Division
of Correction from the community correction center.
(D) A decision to release a defendant administratively
transferred to the Division of Community Correction from the Division of
Correction a community correction center under subdivision (b)(3)(A) of this
section is vested solely with the Post-Prison Transfer Board.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-4-312(d)(1), concerning a defendant not
eligible for placement in a community correction program, is amended to read
as follows:
(d)(1) If after receipt of an order directing a defendant to a
community correction center, the Division of Community Correction department
determines that the defendant is not eligible for placement in a community
correction program under § 16-93-1201 et seq., the Division of Community
Correction department shall not admit the defendant to the community
correction center but shall immediately notify the prosecuting attorney in
writing.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 12-12-911(b)(1), concerning the Sex and
Child Offenders Registration Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) This fund shall consist of special revenues collected pursuant
to § 12-12-910, there to be used equally by the Arkansas Crime Information
Center and the Division of Correction Department of Corrections for the
administration of this subchapter.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 12-12-913(c) and (d), concerning the
disclosure of sex offender registration records, are amended to read as
follows:
(c)(1)(A) The Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall promulgate
guidelines and procedures for the disclosure of relevant and necessary
information regarding sex offenders to the public when the release of the
information is necessary for public protection.
(B) In developing the guidelines and procedures, the Sex
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
Offender Assessment Committee shall consult with persons who, by experience
or training, have a personal interest or professional expertise in law
enforcement, crime prevention, victim advocacy, criminology, psychology,
parole, post-release supervision, public education, and community relations.
(2)(A) The guidelines and procedures shall identify factors
relevant to a sex offender's future dangerousness and likelihood of reoffense
or threat to the community.
(B) The guidelines and procedures shall also address the
extent of the information to be disclosed and the scope of the community to
whom disclosure shall be made as these factors relate to the:
(i) Level of the sex offender's dangerousness;
(ii) Sex offender's pattern of offending behavior;
and
(iii) Need of community members for information to
enhance their individual and collective safety.
(3) The Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall submit the
proposed guidelines and procedures to the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor for their review and shall report to the House Committee on Public
Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor every six (6) months on the implementation of this
section.
(d)(1) A local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction that decides
to disclose information pursuant to this section shall make a good faith
effort to notify the public and residents at least fourteen (14) days before
a sex offender is released or placed into the community.
(2) If a change occurs in a sex offender's release plan, this
notification provision shall not require an extension of the release date.
(3) In conjunction with the notice provided under § 12-12-914,
the Division of Correction Department of Corrections and the Department of
Human Services shall make available to a local law enforcement agency having
jurisdiction all information that the Division of Correction Department of
corrections and the Department of Human Services have concerning the sex
offender, including information on risk factors in the sex offender's
history.

04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 12-12-917(g)(1), concerning the assessment
of a sex offender, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) In cooperation with the committee, the Division of Correction
Department of Corrections shall promulgate rules to establish the review
process for assessment determinations.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 12-12-918(b)(2), concerning the evaluation
to determine that a defendant is a sexually dangerous person, is amended to
read as follows:
(2) The cost of the evaluation shall be paid by the Division of
Correction Department of Corrections.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 12-27-113 is amended to read as follows:
12-27-113. Commitments to the Division of Correction — Records.
(a)(1) All commitments to the Division of Correction shall be to the
Division of Correction and not to a particular institution.
(2) Commitments may provide for judicial or administrative
transfer to the Division of Community Correction a community correction
center operated or contracted by a division of the Department of Corrections.
(b)(1) The Director of the Division of Correction, in accordance with
the rules and procedures promulgated by the Board of Corrections, shall
transfer an inmate to the Division of Community Correction a community
correction center operated or contracted by a division of the department,
pursuant to a judicial transfer, determine the administrative transfer of an
inmate to the Division of Community Correction a community correction center
operated or contracted by a division of the department, or assign a newly
committed inmate to an appropriate facility of the Division of Correction.
(2) The director may transfer an inmate from one (1) facility to
another consistent with the commitment and in accordance with treatment,
training, and security needs.
(3) Inmates may be transferred between the Division of
Correction and the Division of Community Correction secured facilities
operated or contracted by a division of the department within the constraints
of law applicable to judicial or administrative transfer, subject to the
policies and rules established by the Board of Corrections and conditions set
by the Post-Prison Transfer Board.
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(4) The Division of Correction shall retain legal custody of all
inmates transferred to community correction unless altered by court order.
(c)(1) When a prisoner is committed to the Division of Correction, his
or her commitment papers must include a report on the circumstances attending
the offense, particularly such circumstances as tend to aggravate or
extenuate the offense, which report shall be kept in the permanent file of
such prisoner.
(2) The report shall be prepared by the prosecutor or deputy
prosecutor who represented the state in the proceeding against the prisoner.
The report shall be approved by the sentencing judge.
(d)(1) A county sheriff, a deputy county sheriff, or a trained
security contractor shall transport all inmates committed to the Division of
Correction or the Division of Community Correction a secured facility
operated or contracted by a division of the department as described in this
subsection, and the county sheriff is entitled to the fees provided by law.
(2) A county sheriff shall notify the director of the number of
inmates in his or her charge who are under commitment to the Division of
Correction a secured facility operated or contracted by a division of the
department, and upon request to the county sheriff by the director, the
county sheriff, the deputy county sheriff, or the trained security contractor
shall send for, take charge of, and safely transport the inmates to the
nearest appropriate secured facility as determined by the Division of
Correction or the Division of Community Correction.
(3) However, if the county sheriff determines that it would be
in the best interest of an inmate and the public to immediately transport the
inmate to the Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction
because of overcrowding or another issue, the county sheriff may notify the
Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction of the need
for immediate transport and the Division of Correction or the Division of
Community Correction department shall consider the request in scheduling
inmates for intake.
(e)(1) The director shall make and preserve a full and complete record
of every inmate committed to the Division of Correction a secured facility
operated or contracted by a division of the department, along with a
photograph of the inmate and data pertaining to his or her trial conviction
and past history.
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(2)(A) To protect the integrity of records described in
subdivision (e)(1) of this section and to ensure their proper use, it is
unlawful to permit inspection of or disclose information contained in records
described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section or to copy or issue a copy of
all or part of a record described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section
except:
(i) As authorized by rule;
(ii) By order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
or
(iii) Records posted on the Division of Correction's
website as required by § 12-27-145.
(B) A rule under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section
shall provide for adequate standards of security and confidentiality of
records described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section.
(3) For those inmates committed to the Division of Correction
and judicially or administratively transferred to the Division of Community
Correction, the preparation of a record described in subdivision (e)(1) of
this section may be delegated to the Division of Community Correction
pursuant to policies applicable to records transmission adopted by the Board
of Corrections.
(4)(3) A rule under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section may
authorize the disclosure of information contained in a record described in
subdivision (e)(1) of this section for research purposes.
(5)(4)(A)(i) Upon written request, an employee of the Bureau of
Legislative Research acting on behalf of a member of the General Assembly may
view all records described in subdivision (e)(1) of this section of a current
or former inmate.
(ii) A request under subdivision (e)(5)(A)(i)
(e)(4)(A)(i) of this section shall be made in good faith.
(B) A view of records under this subdivision (e)(5) (e)(4)
by an employee may be performed only if the employee is assigned to one (1)
or more of the following committees:
(i) Senate Committee on Judiciary;
(ii) House Committee on Judiciary; or
(iii) Charitable, Penal, and Correctional
Institutions Subcommittee of the Legislative Council.
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(C) The Division of Correction Secretary of the Department
of Corrections shall ensure that the employee authorized under subdivision
(e)(5)(B) (e)(4)(B) of this section to view records is provided access to the
records.
(D) A record requested to be viewed under this subdivision
(e)(5) (e)(4) is privileged and confidential and shall not be shown to any
person not authorized to have access to the record under this section and
shall not be used for any political purpose, including without limitation
political advertising, fundraising, or campaigning.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 12-27-114 is amended to read as follows:
12-27-114. Inmates in county jails — Reimbursement of county — Medical
care.
(a)(1)(A)(i) In the event the Division of Correction a division of the
Department of Corrections cannot accept inmates from county jails due to
insufficient bed space, the Division of Correction department shall reimburse
the counties from the County Jail Reimbursement Fund at rates determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after consultation with Arkansas
Legislative Audit and the Division of Correction department and upon approval
by the Governor, until the appropriation and funding provided for that
purpose are exhausted.
(ii)(B) The reimbursement rate shall include the
county's cost of transporting the inmates to the Division of Correction
division.
(B)(i)(2)(A) Reimbursement under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of
this section shall begin accruing on the date of sentencing.
(ii)(B) The Division of Correction department shall
not reimburse the county until the Division of Correction department receives
a complete and accurate sentencing order.
(2)(A) In the event the Division of Community Correction cannot
accept inmates from county jails due to insufficient bed space or shall have
an inmate confined in a county jail under any prerelease program or sanction
imposed in response to a violation of supervision conditions, the Division of
Community Correction shall reimburse the counties from the fund at rates
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, after consultation with
Arkansas Legislative Audit and the Division of Correction, and upon approval
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
by the Governor, until the appropriation and funding provided for that
purpose are exhausted.
(B)(i) Reimbursement under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section shall begin accruing on either the date of sentencing or the date of
placement on probation accompanied with incarceration in the Division of
Community Correction.
(ii) The Division of Community Correction shall not
reimburse the county until the Division of Community Correction receives a
complete and accurate sentencing order or an order or waiver for a sanction
to a community correction center.
(b)(1)(A) The Division of Correction and the Division of Community
Correction department shall prepare an invoice during the first week of each
month that lists each state inmate that is on the county jail backup list
during the previous month.
(B) The invoice shall reflect the number of days a state
inmate was in the county jail in an awaiting-bed-space status.
(2)(A) The Division of Correction and the Division of Community
Correction department shall verify and forward the invoices to the applicable
county sheriff to certify the actual number of days the state inmates were
physically housed in the county jail.
(B)(i) Upon written request of a county judge, county
treasurer, or county sheriff, the Division of Correction and the Division of
Community Correction department shall provide to the county official making
the request a written report summarizing the year-to-date county jail
reimbursement invoices prepared and forwarded for verification by the
Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction department
and payment from the fund.
(ii) In addition, the written report shall include a
summary of invoices returned by each county for payment for previous months
within the fiscal year, the amounts paid, and any balances owed.
(3)(A) The certified invoices shall then be returned to the
Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction department
for payment from the fund.
(B) Payment from the fund shall be made within five (5)
business days of receipt of signed and certified invoices returned by each
county, subject to funding made available for payment of the certified
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
notices.
(4) The county sheriff shall maintain documentation for three
(3) calendar years to confirm the number of days each state inmate was
physically housed in the county jail.
(5) The documentation maintained by the county sheriff is
subject to review by Arkansas Legislative Audit.
(6) Invoices under this subsection may be mailed or sent
electronically.
(c)(1) The Board of Corrections shall adopt rules by which the
Division of Correction or the Division of Community Correction department
shall reimburse any county that is required to retain an inmate awaiting
delivery to the custody of either the Division of Correction or the Division
of Community Correction, upon receipt of a complete and accurate sentencing
order or an order or waiver for a sanction to a community correction center,
for the actual costs paid for any emergency medical care for physical injury
or illness of the inmate retained under this section if the physical injury
or illness is directly related to the incarceration and the county is
required by law to provide the care for inmates in the jail.
(2) The Director of the Division of Correction or his or her
designee or the Director of the Division of Community Correction or his or
her designee department may accept custody of any inmate as soon as possible
upon request of the county upon determining that the inmate is required to
have extended medical care.
(3)(A) Reimbursements for medical expenses under this subsection
shall require prior approval of the Division of Correction or the Division of
Community Correction department before the rendering of health care.
(B)(i) In a true emergency situation, health care may be
rendered without prior approval.
(ii) The Division of Correction or the Division of
Community Correction department shall be notified of a true emergency
situation immediately after the true emergency situation.
(C)(i) Reimbursements under this subsection begin accruing
on the date of sentencing.
(ii) The Division of Correction or Division of
Community Correction department shall not reimburse the county under this
subsection until the Division of Correction or Division of Community
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
Correction department receives a complete and accurate sentencing order or an
order or waiver for a sanction to a community correction center.
(d)(1)(A) The Division of Correction and Division of Community
Correction department shall prepare a monthly report of county jail
reimbursement invoices under this section for payment from the County Jail
Reimbursement Fund fund.
(B) The monthly report under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this
section shall:
(i) Be posted on the website of the Division of
Correction and the website of the Division of Community Correction department
for at least three (3) years; and
(ii) Include a summary of invoices returned by each
county for payment for previous months within the fiscal year, the amounts
paid, and any balances owed.
(2) The monthly reports under subdivision (d)(1)(A) of this
section shall be combined into one (1) annual report at the end of each
fiscal year.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 12-27-115 is amended to read as follows:
12-27-115. Claims of counties for expenses — Verification.
(a) When any county in which an institution of the Department of
Correction a secured facility operated or contracted by a division of the
Department of Corrections is located shall incur expenses in connection with
any legal proceedings involved or occasioned by any inmate of a penal
institution the secured facility, the county shall be entitled to
reimbursement for such expenses from the Department of Correction Fund by the
department.
(b) All claims by counties against the fund pursuant to this section
shall be itemized, and the claims shall be verified by the county judge and
presented to the Director of the Department of Correction department within
ninety (90) days after the expense is incurred.
(c) Upon receipt of the verified claims, the director department shall
pay the claim from funds appropriated for the maintenance and operation of
the department.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 12-27-125 is amended to read as follows:
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
12-27-125. Division of Community Correction — Creation — Powers and
duties.
(a) There is established, under the supervision, control, and
direction of the Board of Corrections, a Division of Community Correction.
(b) The Division of Community Correction shall have the following
functions, powers, and duties, administered in accordance with the policies
and rules promulgated by the Board of Corrections:
(1) It shall assume management and control over all properties,
both real and personal, facilities, books, records, equipment, supplies,
materials, contracts, funds, moneys, equities, and all other properties
belonging to the Arkansas Adult Probation Commission [abolished], and all
such properties transferred from the Department of Correction, as the
Division of Correction was known as prior to July 1, 2019, by the Board of
Corrections;
(2)(A) It shall have management and control over all community
correction services. except management of secured community correction
centers;
(B) It shall have management and control over all
community correction facilities within the purview of the Board of
Corrections existing on or created after July 1, 1993;
(3) It shall employ such officers, employees, and agents and
shall secure such offices and quarters as deemed necessary to discharge the
functions of the Division of Community Correction, and which are
appropriately funded;
(4) It may establish and operate regional community correction
facilities if funds for the regional community correction facilities have
been authorized and appropriated by the General Assembly;
(5)(A) It may exercise all legally sanctioned supervision and
appropriate care over all offenders referred with proper documentation from
the circuit courts and all offenders transferred with proper documentation
from the Division of Correction pursuant to policies established by the Board
of Corrections and conditions set by the Post-Prison Transfer Board.
(B) Legal custody remains with the referring court or the
Division of Correction;
(6) It shall administer the provision of probation services for
offenders processed through circuit courts;
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(7) It shall administer the provision of parole and post-release
supervision services in coordination with the Post-Prison Transfer Board and
in cooperation with the Division of Correction;
(8) It shall provide support services to the Post-Prison
Transfer Board or its designated representatives as determined by the Post-
Prison Transfer Board;
(9) It shall assist the Board of Corrections in the furtherance
of its goals by staffing the specific charges articulated for it through
legislation and by the Board of Corrections;
(10) It shall conduct statewide public education and training to
foster the provision of correctional supervision and service in community
settings;
(11) It shall provide technical assistance when necessary to any
entity, program, division, or agency receiving assistance or clients through
the Division of Community Correction;
(12) It shall facilitate the development of a comprehensive
community correction plan through the provision of funding, criteria review,
and ongoing evaluation to ensure the maintenance of quality in supervision
and programming;
(13) It may accept gifts, grants, and funds from both public and
private sources with prior approval of the Board of Corrections;
(14) It shall establish minimum standards for case loads,
programs, facilities, and equipment and other aspects of the operation of
community correction programs and facilities necessary for the provision of
adequate and effective supervision and service;
(15) It shall establish minimum standards for the employment of
community correction employees;
(16) It shall establish programs of research, evaluation,
statistics, audit, and planning, including studies and evaluation of the
performance of various functions and activities of the Department of
Corrections and studies affecting the treatment of offenders and information
about other programs;
(17)(16)(A) It may receive and disburse moneys ordered to be
paid by offenders pursuant to statutory economic sanctions.
(B) It may receive fees to be levied by the courts or
authorized by the Board of Corrections for participation in specified
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
programs and to be paid by offenders on community correction.
(C) The payment of such sanctions and fees may be a
condition of probation, parole, post-release supervision, or post-prison
transfer or attached to admission and participation in a community correction
program.
(D) The moneys collected shall be deposited into an
earmarked account at the state level to be used solely for the continuation
and expansion of community correction in this state.
(E) Economic sanction officers are to be authorized by the
Division of Community Correction to perform these duties pursuant to policies
and procedures adopted by the Board of Corrections and in accord with any
state statutory accounting requirements;
(18)(17) It may cooperate and contract with the federal
government, with governmental agencies of Arkansas and other states, with
political subdivisions of Arkansas, and with private contractors to provide
and improve community correction options;
(19)(18) It may inspect and evaluate any community correction
site and conduct audits of financial and service records at any reasonable
time to determine compliance with the Board of Corrections' rules and
standards;
(20)(19)(A) It shall maintain a full and complete record of each
offender under its supervision.
(B)(i) To protect the integrity of a record described in
subdivision (b)(20)(A) (b)(19)(A) of this section and to ensure its proper
use, it is unlawful to permit inspection of or disclose information contained
in a record described in subdivision (b)(20)(A) (b)(19)(A) of this section or
to copy or issue a copy of any part of the record except:
(a) As authorized by administrative rule;
(b) By order of a court of competent
jurisdiction; or
(c) Records posted on the Division of
Community Correction's website as required by § 12-27-145.
(ii) The rules under subdivision (b)(20)(B)(i)(a)
(b)(19)(B)(i)(a) shall provide for adequate standards of security and
confidentiality of a record described in subdivision (b)(20)(A) (b)(19)(A) of
this section; and
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(21)(20) Subject to availability of funds, it shall employ
officers, employees, and agents and secure sufficient offices for monitoring
each sex offender on parole, post-release supervision, or probation who is
required to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, § 12-
12-901 et seq., and who has been assessed as a risk Level 3 or Level 4
offender; and
(22)(A) It may issue an arrest warrant for the arrest of
any person who, while in its custody, unlawfully escapes from the Division of
Community Correction.
(B) The arrest warrant shall authorize:
(i) All law enforcement officers of this state to
take into custody and return the person named in the arrest warrant to the
custody of the Division of Community Correction or the Division of
Correction; and
(ii) All law enforcement officers of this state, any
other state, or the federal government to take into custody and detain the
person in a suitable detention facility while awaiting further transfer to
the Division of Community Correction or the Division of Correction.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 12-27-127 is amended to read as follows:
12-27-127. Transfer to the Division of Community Correction community
correction center — Transfer of an inmate between divisions.
(a)(1) A commitment shall be treated as a commitment to the Division
of Correction and subject to regular transfer eligibility.
(2) However, an inmate may be judicially or administratively
transferred to the Division of Community Correction a community correction
center by the Division of Correction unless the court indicates on the
sentencing order that the Division of Correction shall not administratively
transfer a statutorily eligible inmate to the Division of Community
Correction a community correction center in accordance with the rules
promulgated by the Board of Corrections.
(b)(1) In accordance with rules and procedures promulgated by the
Board of Corrections and the orders of the committing court, the Director of
the Division of Community Correction shall assign a newly transferred inmate
to an appropriate facility, placement, program, or status within the Division
of Community Correction community correction center.
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(2) The director may transfer an inmate from one facility,
placement, program, or status to another facility, placement, program, or
status consistent with the commitment, applicable law, and in accordance with
treatment, training, and security needs.
(3)(A) An inmate may be administratively transferred back to the
Division of Correction from the Division of Community Correction removed from
a community correction center by the Post-Prison Transfer Board following a
hearing in which the inmate is found ineligible for placement in a Division
of Community Correction facility community correction center as he or she
fails to meet the criteria or standards established by law or policy adopted
by the Board of Corrections or has been found guilty of a violation of the
rules of the facility.
(B) Time served in a community correction facility or
under supervision by the Division of Community Correction a community
correction center shall be credited against the sentence contained in the
commitment to the Division of Correction.
(c)(1) In accordance with rules and procedures promulgated by the
Board of Corrections, upon receipt of a referral from the director or his or
her designee, the Post-Prison Transfer Board may release from confinement an
inmate who has been:
(A) Sentenced and judicially or administratively
transferred to the Division of Community Correction a community correction
center;
(B) Incarcerated for a minimum of:
(i) One hundred eighty (180) days for a sentence of
four (4) years or less; or
(ii) Two hundred seventy (270) days for a sentence of
more than four (4) years but less than six (6) years; and
(C) Determined by the Division of Community Correction
Secretary of the Department of Corrections to have successfully completed its
the therapeutic program prescribed by the secretary.
(2)(A) The General Assembly finds that the power granted to the
Post-Prison Transfer Board under subdivision (c)(1) of this section will:
(i) Aid the therapeutic rehabilitation of the
inmates judicially or administratively transferred to the Division of
Community Correction; and
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(ii) More efficiently use the correctional resources
of the State of Arkansas.
(B) The power granted to the Post-Prison Transfer Board
under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be the sole authority required
for the accomplishment of the purposes set forth in this subdivision (c)(2),
and when the Post-Prison Transfer Board exercises its power under this
section, it shall not be necessary for the Post-Prison Transfer Board to
comply with general provisions of other laws dealing with the minimum time
constraints as applied to release eligibility.
(3) This subsection does not grant the Post-Prison Transfer
Board or the Division of Community Correction Department of Corrections the
authority either to detain an inmate beyond the sentence imposed upon him or
her by a transferring court or to shorten that sentence.
(d)(1) An inmate of the Division of Correction who is to be
transferred to post-release supervision may be administratively transferred
to the Division of Community Correction when the inmate is within eighteen
(18) months of his or her projected release date for the purpose of
participating in a reentry program of at least six (6) months in length.
(2) Each inmate administratively transferred under this
subsection shall be thoroughly screened and approved for participation by the
director or his or her designee.
(3) In accordance with rules promulgated by the Board of
Corrections, upon receipt of a referral from the director or his or her
designee, the Post-Prison Transfer Board may release from incarceration an
inmate who has been:
(A) Administratively transferred to the Division of
Community Correction; and
(B) Determined by the Division of Community Correction to
have successfully completed its reentry program.
(4) An inmate who has been administratively transferred under
this subsection shall be administratively transferred back to the Division of
Correction if he or she:
(A) Is denied parole or transfer to post-release
supervision; or
(B) Fails to complete or is removed from the reentry
program.
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 12-29-205(a)(1), concerning good time
earned pending transfer to the Division of Correction or Division of
Community Correction, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) Any person who is sentenced by a circuit court to the Division
of Correction or the Division of Community Correction an imposed period of
incarceration at a facility operated or contracted by a division of the
Department of Corrections and is awaiting transfer to the Division of
Correction or Division of Community Correction a facility operated or
contracted by a division of the department may earn meritorious good time in
accordance with law and rules as adopted by the Board of Corrections.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 16-93-306(d)(3), concerning administrative
sanctions for probationers, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Intermediate sanctions shall include without limitation:
(A) Day reporting;
(B) Community service;
(C) Increased substance abuse screening and or treatment,
or both;
(D) Increased monitoring, including electronic monitoring
and home confinement; and
(E)(i) Incarceration in a county jail for no more than
seven (7) days or incarceration in a Division of Community Correction or
Division of Correction facility operated or contracted by a division of the
department for no more than one hundred eighty (180) days.
(ii)(a) Incarceration as an intermediate sanction
shall not be used more than six (6) times with an individual probationer.
(b) A probationer shall accumulate no more
than thirty (30) days' incarceration in a county jail or no more than three
hundred sixty (360) days' incarceration in a Division of Community Correction
or Division of Correction facility operated or contracted by a division of
the Department of Corrections as an intermediate sanction before the
probation officer recommends a violation of the person's probation under §
16-93-307.
(c) A probationer is subject to a period of
incarceration of:
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(1) Up to ninety (90) days in a Division
of Community Correction or Division of Correction facility operated or
contracted by a division of the department for a technical conditions
violation; and
(2) Exactly one hundred eighty (180)
days in a Division of Community Correction or Division of Correction facility
operated or contracted by a division of the department for a serious
conditions violation.
(d) A probationer may not be incarcerated more
than two (2) times as a probation sanction in a Division of Community
Correction or Division of Correction facility operated or contracted by a
division of the department during a two-year period.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 16-93-306(g), concerning the period of
incarceration for an administrative sanction of a probationer, is amended to
read as follows:
(g) A period of incarceration under this section:
(1) May be reduced by the Division of Correction or the Division
of Community Correction a division of the department for good behavior and
successful program completion; and
(2) Shall not be reduced under this section for more than fifty
percent (50%) of the total time of incarceration ordered to be served.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 16-93-308(i)(1)(B), concerning a probation
revocation is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) A defendant on probation is subject to having his
or her probation revoked and being sentenced to the Division of Correction or
the Division of Community Correction a facility operated or contracted by a
division of the Department of Corrections for a subsequent violation of his
or her probation if the defendant has been confined six (6) times under § 16-
93-306(d).
(ii) After a defendant on probation has been
confined two (2) times under either § 16-93-306(d) or § 16-93-309(a)(4) for
any combination of a technical conditions violation or serious conditions
violation for any period of time, the defendant on probation is subject to
having his or her probation revoked and being sentenced to the Division of
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
Correction or the Division of Community Correction a facility operated or
contracted by a division of the department for a subsequent violation of his
or her probation.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 16-93-309(b)(1), concerning a period of
confinement imposed by a court on a person who is serving a suspended
imposition of sentence or on probation after a revocation hearing, is amended
to read as follows:
(b)(1) A period of confinement under subdivision (a)(4) of this
section may be reduced by the Division of Correction or the Division of
Community Correction a division of the Department of Corrections for good
behavior and successful program completion.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 16-93-310 is amended to read as follows:
16-93-310. Probation generally — Revocation — Community correction
program.
(a) When a person sentenced under a community correction program, § 5-
4-312, violates any terms or conditions of his or her sentence or term of
probation, revocation of the sentence or term of probation shall be
consistent with the procedures under this subchapter.
(b) Upon revocation, the court of jurisdiction shall determine whether
the offender shall remain under the jurisdiction of the court and be assigned
to a more restrictive community correction program, facility, or institution
for a period of time or committed to the Division of Community Correction a
community correction center.
(c)(1) If committed to the Division of Correction, the court shall
specify if the commitment is for judicial transfer of the offender to the
Division of Community Correction or is a regular commitment a community
correction center.
(2)(A) The court shall commit the eligible offender to the
custody of the Division of Correction under this subchapter for judicial or
administrative transfer to the Division of Community Correction a community
correction center subject to the following:
(i) That the sentence imposed provides that the
offender shall serve no more than three (3) years of confinement, with credit
for meritorious good time or earned release credits, with initial placement
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
in a Division of Community Correction facility community correction center;
and
(ii) That the initial placement in the Division of
Community Correction a community correction center is conditioned upon the
offender's continuing eligibility for Division of Community Correction
community correction center placement and the offender's compliance with all
applicable rules established by the Board of Corrections for community
correction programs.
(B) Post-prison supervision shall accompany and follow
community correction programming when appropriate.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 16-93-614(c)(2), concerning parole
eligibility for offenses committed after January 1, 1994, is amended to read
as follows:
(2)(A)(i)(a) An offender convicted of a target offense under §
16-93-1201 et seq. may be committed to the Division of Correction and
judicially or administratively transferred to the Division of Community
Correction a community correction center by provision in the commitment that
the trial court order or authorize such a transfer.
(b) No other offender is eligible for transfer
to a Division of Community Correction facility a community correction center.
(ii) A copy of the commitment shall be forwarded
immediately to the Division of Correction and to the Division of Community
Correction Department of Corrections.
(iii) In the event that an offender is sentenced to
the Division of Correction without judicial or administrative transfer on one
(1) sentence and concurrently sentenced to the Division of Correction with
judicial or administrative transfer on another sentence, the offender shall
remain in the Division of Correction, and the sentence with judicial or
administrative transfer may be discharged in the same manner as that of an
offender transferred back to the Division of Correction.
(B) The Division of Community Correction shall take over
supervision of the offender in accordance with the order of the court.
(C) The Division of Community Correction shall provide for
the appropriate disposition of the offender as expeditiously as practicable
under rules developed by the Board of Corrections.
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(D) The offender shall not be transported to the Division
of Correction on the initial placement in a Division of Community Correction
facility pursuant to a judicial or administrative transfer.
(E)(B) An offender who is transferred back to the Division
of Correction removed from a community correction center for disciplinary
reasons may be considered for transfer to Division of Community Correction
supervision after earning good-time credit equal to one-half (½) of the
remainder of his or her sentence.
(F)(C) An offender who is sentenced after July 31, 2007,
and who is transferred back to the Division of Correction removed from a
community correction center for administrative reasons is eligible for
transfer to Division of Community Correction supervision in the same manner
as an offender who is sentenced to the Division of Correction without a
judicial or administrative transfer to the Division of Community Correction a
community correction center; and

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 16-93-617 is amended to read as follows:
16-93-617. Parole eligibility procedures — Offenses committed after
January 1, 1994 — Revocation of transfer.
(a) In the event an offender transferred under this section, §§ 16-93-
614 — 16-93-616, or § 16-93-618 violates the terms or conditions of his or
her transfer, a hearing shall follow all applicable legal requirements and
shall be subject to any additional policies and rules set by the Post-Prison
Transfer Board.
(b)(1) In the event an offender transferred under this section and §§
16-93-614 — 16-93-616, or § 16-93-618 is found to be or becomes ineligible
for transfer into a Division of Community Correction facility community
correction center, he or she shall be transported to the a Division of
Correction facility to serve the remainder of his or her sentence.
(2) Notice of the ineligibility and the reasons therefor shall
be provided to the offender, and a hearing may be requested before the board
if the offender contests the factual basis of the ineligibility. Otherwise,
the board may administratively approve the transfer to the Division of
Correction removal from a community correction center.
(c) An offender who is judicially transferred to a Division of
Community Correction facility and subsequently transferred back to the
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
Division of Correction a community correction center and subsequently removed
by the board for disciplinary or administrative reasons may not become
eligible for any further transfer under § 16-93-614(c)(2)(E) and (F)(B) and
(C).

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 16-93-712(d)(3), concerning administrative
sanctions for parolees, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Intermediate sanctions shall include without limitation:
(A) Day reporting;
(B) Community service;
(C) Increased substance abuse screening or treatment, or
both;
(D) Increased monitoring, including electronic monitoring
and home confinement; and
(E)(i) Incarceration in a county jail for no more than
seven (7) days or incarceration in a Division of Community Correction
facility or Division of Correction facility operated or contracted by a
division of the Department of Corrections for no more than one hundred twenty
(120) days.
(ii)(a) Incarceration as an intermediate sanction
shall not be used more than six (6) times with an individual parolee.
(b) A parolee shall accumulate no more than
twenty-one (21) days' incarceration in a county jail or no more than two
hundred forty (240) days' incarceration in a Division of Community Correction
facility or Division of Correction facility operated or contracted by a
division of the department as an intermediate sanction before the community
supervision officer recommends a violation of the person's parole under § 16-
93-706.
(c) A parolee is subject to a period of
incarceration of:
(1) Up to sixty (60) days in a Division
of Community Correction facility or Division of Correction facility operated
or contracted by a division of the department for a technical conditions
violation; and
(2) One hundred twenty (120) days in a
Division of Community Correction facility or Division of Correction facility
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
operated or contracted by a division of the department for a serious
conditions violation.
(d) A parolee may not be incarcerated more
than two (2) times as a parole sanction in a Division of Community Correction
facility or Division of Correction operated or contracted by a division of
the department facility during a two-year period.

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1202(2)(G)(i), concerning the things
included in the definition of "community correction" with respect to
community correction programs, is amended to read as follows:
(G)(i) Community correction facilities centers,
multipurpose facilities encompassing security, correction, and services such
that offenders can be housed therein when necessary but can also be assigned
to or access correction programs and services which are housed there.

SECTION 23. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1202(4)—(6), concerning definitions
with respect to community correction, is amended to read as follows:
(4) “Division of Community Correction” means the administrative
structure in place to oversee the development and operation of community
correction facilities, programs, and services, including probation, parole,
and post-release supervision;
(5) “Division of Correction” means the administrative structure
in place to oversee the daily operation of secure prison facilities and the
security functions of community correction centers;
(6) “Eligibility” or “eligible offender” means any person
convicted of a felony who is by law eligible for such sentence or who is
otherwise under the supervision of the Division of Community Correction and
who falls within the population targeted by the General Assembly for
inclusion in community correction facilities centers and who has not been
subject to a disciplinary violation for a violent act or for sexual
misconduct while in the custody of a jail or correctional facility and does
not have a current or previous conviction for a violent or sexual offense
listed under subdivision (10)(A)(ii) of this section;

SECTION 24. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1202(8), concerning the definition
of "supervision" with respect to community correction, is amended to read as
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
follows:
(8) “Supervision” means direct supervision at varying levels of
intensity by community supervision officers in the case of sentences to
probation with a condition of community correction or offenders eligible for
release on parole or post-release supervision or offenders transferred to
community correction or community supervision from the Division of
Correction;

SECTION 25. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1202(10)(C), concerning the
definition of "target group" with respect to community correction, is amended
to read as follows:
(C) Final determination of eligibility for placement in any
community correction center or program is the responsibility of the Division
of Community Correction;

SECTION 26. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1205 is amended to read as follows:
16-93-1205. Operation and supervision of community correction programs.
(a) The Board of Corrections shall promulgate policies and rules
relating to the operation of community correction facilities and programs,
the supervision of eligible offenders participating therein, and the
termination of that participation, including but not limited to:
(1) The terms, conditions, and qualifications of program
eligibility;
(2) The time to be spent in specific correction and treatment
programs designated as community correction;
(3) Receipt of compensation in the form of fees or other
available sources from the eligible offender while participating in a
community correction program;
(4) Allocation of compensation received by an eligible offender
while participating in a community correction program, including designation
to the Division of Community Correction Department of Corrections of a
percentage of any compensation received for the purpose of defraying the
costs to the division department of establishing and operating community
correction programs and the costs of the offender's custody and care;
(5) Receipt of compensation from public entities who benefit
from the labor of offenders involved in community correction work programs;
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
and
(6) Collection of economic sanctions imposed by the court,
including, but not limited to, restitution, fines, fees, or other monetary
penalties attached to an offender's sentence.
(b) The division department shall supervise all eligible offenders
participating in any community correction program with the goal of promoting
the safety and welfare of the people of the state.

SECTION 27. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1207(a) and (b), concerning an order
of the court placing an offender on probation and an order sealing an
offender's criminal record, are amended to read as follows:
(a) Upon the sentencing or placing on probation of any person under
the provisions of this subchapter, the sentencing court shall issue an order
or commitment, whichever is appropriate, in writing, setting forth the
following:
(1) That the offender is being:
(A) Committed to the Division of Correction;
(B) Committed to the Division of Correction with judicial
transfer to the Division of Community Correction a community correction
center;
(C) Placed on suspended imposition of sentence;
(D) Placed on probation under the provisions of this
subchapter; or
(E) Committed to a county jail for a misdemeanor offense
committed after January 1, 2007;
(2) That the offender has knowledge and understanding of the
consequences of the sentence or placement on probation and violations
thereof;
(3) A designation of sentence or supervision length along with
community correction program distinctions of that sentence or supervision
length;
(4) Any applicable terms and conditions of the sentence or
probation term; and
(5) Presentence investigation or sentencing information,
including, but not limited to, criminal history elements and other
appropriate or necessary information for correctional use.
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(b)(1) Upon the successful completion of probation or a commitment to
the Division of Correction with judicial transfer to the Division of
Community Correction a community correction center or a commitment to a
county jail for one (1) of the offenses targeted by the General Assembly for
community correction placement, the court may direct that the record of the
offender be sealed with regards to the offense of which the offender was
either convicted or placed on probation under the condition that the offender
has no more than one (1) previous felony conviction and that the previous
felony was other than a conviction for:
(A) A capital offense;
(B) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(C) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(D) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(E) Kidnapping, § 5-11-102;
(F) Aggravated robbery, § 5-12-103; or
(G) Delivering controlled substances to a minor as
prohibited in the former § 5-64-410.
(2) The fact that a prior felony conviction has been previously
sealed shall not prevent its counting as a prior conviction for the purposes
of this subsection.
(3) The procedure, effect, and definition of “sealed” for the
purposes of this subsection shall be in accordance with that established in
the Comprehensive Criminal Record Sealing Act of 2013, § 16-90-1401 et seq.

SECTION 28. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1804(1), concerning release
eligibility for felonies committed on or after January 1, 2025, is amended to
read as follows:
(1) A person who commits an offense meeting the definition of
target group as defined under § 16-93-1202 and who is judicially or
administratively transferred to a community correction center is eligible for
transfer to post-release supervision as follows:
(A) If the person is transferred back to the Division of
Correction removed from the community correction center for disciplinary
reasons, he or she is ineligible to accrue earned release credits against the
sentence for which he or she is transferred to the Division of Correction
removed from the community correction center for disciplinary reasons;
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
(B) If the person is transferred back to the Division of
Correction removed from the community correction center for administrative
reasons, he or she may be considered for transfer to post-release supervision
as otherwise authorized in § 16-93-1803 and this section;
(C) If the person is not transferred back to the Division
of Correction removed from the community correction center for administrative
or disciplinary reasons, he or she is eligible for release under § 12-27-
127(c); and
(D) A person who has committed a felony that is within the
target group as defined under § 16-93-1202 and who is transferred to
community supervision is eligible, under the rules established by the Post-
Prison Transfer Board, for commitment to a community correction facility if
he or she is found to be in violation of any of his or her conditions of
post-release supervision, unless the post-release supervision violation
constitutes a non-target felony offense;

SECTION 29. Arkansas Code § 16-93-1907(a)(3), concerning
administrative sanctions for post-release supervision, is amended to read as
follows:
(3) Intermediate sanctions shall include without limitation:
(A) Community service;
(B) Increased substance abuse screening and treatment;
(C) Increased monitoring, including electronic monitoring
and home confinement; and
(D)(i) Incarceration in a county or regional jail for no
more than seven (7) days or incarceration in a Division of Correction
facility or a Division of Community Correction facility operated or
contracted by a division of the Department of Corrections for no more than
ninety (90) days.
(ii)(a) Incarceration as an intermediate sanction
shall not be used more than six (6) times with an offender on post-release
supervision.
(b) If an offender on post-release supervision
accumulates more than thirty (30) days' incarceration in a county or regional
jail or more than three hundred sixty (360) days' incarceration in a Division
of Correction facility or a Division of Community Correction facility
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
operated or contracted by a division of the department as an intermediate
sanction, the community supervision officer shall recommend a revocation of
the offender's post-release supervision under § 16-93-1908.
(c) An offender shall not be incarcerated more
than two (2) times as a result of an intermediate sanction in a Division of
Correction facility operated or contracted by a division of the department
during any two-year period.

SECTION 30. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
The Residential Services Section of the Division of Community
Correction’s statutory powers, duties, and functions, including the functions
of budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds that are
utilized for the operation of community correction centers are transferred to
the Division of Correction within the Department of Corrections.

SECTION 31. DO NOT CODIFY. Temporary language.
The Sex Offender Community Notification Section of the Division of
Correction’s statutory powers, duties, and functions, including the functions
of budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts, personnel, property, and
unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds are
transferred to the Department of Corrections.

SECTION 32. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that repeat criminal activity
threatens the safety of the state; that the transfer of certain powers and
duties of the Department of Corrections to the appropriate divisions will
improve the ability of the department to address repeat criminal activity;
and that this act is immediately necessary to ensure the timely transfer of
certain powers and duties of the department to the appropriate division to
reduce the rate of recidivism. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist,
and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public
peace, health, and safety shall become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB539
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overriden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

SECTION 33. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, to the
extent that a conflict exists between an act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(1) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(2) All of the enactments of each act shall be given effect
except to the extent of irreconcilable conflicts, in which case the
conflicting provision of this act shall prevail.
(b) This section shall not revive or re-enact any provision of the
Arkansas Code that has been repealed by an act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly, including without limitation this act.

/s/Gilmore



















04-01-2025 11:37:38 CEB171